Utah statutes.
9-7-301.   Board of control.

(1)  There is created the board of control of the State Law Library consisting of the attorney general, legislative general counsel, and the chief justice of the Supreme Court.

(2)  The members of the board may not receive salary, per diem, or expenses for their service.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

